Utah statutes.
26-20-10.   Revocation of license of assisted living facility -- Appointment
of receiver.
(1) If the license of an assisted living facility is revoked for violation of
this chapter, the county attorney may file a petition with the district court
for the county in which the facility is located for the appointment of a
receiver.
(2)  The district court shall issue an order to show cause why a receiver
should not be appointed returnable within five days after the filing of the
petition.
(3)  If the court finds that the facts warrant the granting of the petition,
the court shall appoint a receiver to take charge of the facility. The court
may determine fair compensation for the receiver.
(4)  A receiver appointed pursuant to this section shall have the powers and
duties prescribed by the court.
